Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-8,319
Rules and regulations.

The State Claims Board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the In the Line of Duty Compensation Act.

Laws 2021, LB255, § 5.